Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202623-346.01
Perpetual inventory in certain counties.

In all counties having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or more inhabitants as determined by the most recent federal decennial census, the county clerk or the county clerk's designee shall keep a perpetual inventory of all personal property of the county.

Laws 1879, § 150, p. 392;

R.S.1913, § 1089;

C.S.1922, § 1014;

C.S.1929, § 26-706;

Laws 1943, c. 57, § 2, p. 227;

R.S.1943, § 23-322;

Laws 1974, LB 1007, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-322;

Laws 2026, LB596, § 1.
July 18, 2026
Failure to carry out provisions of section will not justify removal of officer in absence of evil intent. Hiatt v. Tomlinson, 100 Neb. 51, 158 N.W. 383 (1916).